Utah statutes.
26-23-5.5.   Illegal use of birth certificate -- Penalties.

(1)  It is a third degree felony for any person to willfully and knowingly:

(a)  and with the intent to deceive, obtain, possess, use, sell, furnish, or attempt to obtain, possess, use, sell, or furnish to another any certificate of birth or certified copy of a certificate of birth knowing that the certificate or certified copy was issued upon information which is false in whole or in part or which relates to the birth of another person, whether living or deceased; or

(b)  furnish or process a certificate of birth or certified copy of a certificate of birth with the knowledge or intention that it be used for the purpose of deception by a person other than the person to whom the certificate of birth relates.

(2)  The specific criminal violations and the criminal penalty under this section take precedence over any more general criminal offense as described in Section 26-23-5.

